Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB1170.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2238XC (2) 91 lh/ko S.F. _____ Section 1. NEW SECTION . 231.33A Area agencies on aging ââ 1 dementia service specialists. 2 1. Each area agency on aging shall provide for the position 3 of a dementia service specialist in an effort to increase 4 access and connections to local supports and services for 5 persons living with dementia, their families, and caregivers, 6 and to increase awareness about dementia within the network 7 of area agency on aging providers as well as in counties, 8 communities, and businesses throughout the state. In addition, 9 the department shall provide for the position of a dementia 10 services coordinator to provide statewide coordination of 11 dementia initiatives and dementia service specialists. 12 2. The duties of a dementia service specialist shall include 13 but are not limited to all of the following: 14 a. Supporting people living with dementia, their families, 15 and caregivers including through conducting education and 16 outreach activities to increase community awareness of dementia 17 and the resources available to support individuals with 18 dementia and their caregivers. 19 b. Providing referrals to support groups, respite care 20 providers, research opportunities, and other community 21 resources. 22 c. Conducting community cognitive screenings, and training 23 area agency on aging staff to conduct cognitive screenings. 24 d. Building dementia-capable area agencies on aging through 25 staff trainings, resources, and support. 26 e. Promoting dementia-capable communities by serving as 27 a supporter for dementia-friendly initiatives, presenting 28 dementia-friendly sessions and trainings to consumers and 29 businesses, and serving as a resource for dementia-friendly 30 community action teams. 31 f. Providing technical assistance for internal and external 32 program planning to enhance relevance and improve access for 33 people living with dementia including through support groups, 34 evidence-based programs, meal sites, and home-delivered meal 35 -1- LSB 2238XC (2) 91 lh/ko 1/ 3 S.F. _____ programs. 1 g. Providing training and technical assistance related to 2 dementia, and how to work effectively with a person who has 3 dementia in a crisis situation, to first responder or public 4 safety agencies including law enforcement, emergency medical 5 service providers, fire and rescue teams, adult protective 6 services workers, and crisis response workers within the 7 service area. 8 3. The duties of a dementia services coordinator shall 9 include but are not limited to the following: 10 a. Coordinating state-funded and privately funded dementia 11 services within the state. 12 b. Coordinating the dementia service specialist program 13 within the area agencies on aging. 14 c. Coordinating the implementation of the Alzheimerâs 15 disease and related dementias state plan. 16 d. Assessing and analyzing dementia-related data collected 17 by the state. 18 e. Evaluating state-funded dementia services. 19 f. Identifying and supporting the development of 20 dementia-specific trainings. 21 g. Performing other duties as may be required to ensure the 22 state is addressing Alzheimerâs and related dementias. 23 Sec. 2. DEMENTIA SERVICE SPECIALISTS ââ DEMENTIA SERVICES 24 COORDINATOR ââ APPROPRIATION. There is appropriated from the 25 general fund of the state to the department of health and human 26 services for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending 27 June 30, 2026, the following amount, or so much thereof as is 28 necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 29 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 750,000 30 The funds appropriated in this section shall be used by the 31 area agencies on aging to provide a dementia service specialist 32 in each of the area agencies on aging and to provide for a 33 dementia services coordinator within the department of health 34 and human services as provided in section 231.33A, as enacted 35 -2- LSB 2238XC (2) 91 lh/ko 2/ 3 S.F. _____ in this Act. 1